Missouri, session 2026, HB2121.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 160.2501, to read as follows:
160.2501. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Religious Liberty in Schools Awareness Act".
2. Each public school shall post a statement containing the following or
substantially similar information:
The Missouri Religious Liberty in Schools Awareness Act
requires that students and employees of public schools that are
operated at public expense be advised and therefore encouraged
regarding constitutional rights and liberties in the educational
setting that are assured by the First Amendment to the United
States Constitution, free from government coercion:
For public school students, such rights and liberties include, but
are not limited to, that a student may, in a manner that does not
interrupt or displace the educational mission of the public school:
Express the student's beliefs about religion to others;
Pray or engage in religious expression or read the Bible or other
religious texts or materials during free time including, but not
limited to, in the classroom;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2121 2
When relevant to the subject matter, express the student's beliefs
about religion in a class assignment; and
Form, organize, and participate or refrain from participating in,
prayer groups, religious clubs, and other religious gatherings if
other secular groups, clubs, and gatherings are permitted.
For public school employees, such rights and liberties include, but
are not limited to, that an employee may, in a manner that does
not interrupt or displace the educational mission of the public
school:
Respectfully discuss the employee's faith with other school
employees;
When relevant to the subject matter, discuss the influence of
religion on history and culture;
Enjoy the accommodation of the employee's religious beliefs as
required by law;
Sponsor student religious clubs if secular student clubs are
sponsored; and
Enjoy freedom from religious discrimination as provided by law.
3. (1) The statement required to be posted under this section shall be posted in a
prominent location in each of such public school's buildings in which the academic
instruction of students actually and regularly occurs.
(2) Such statement shall be posted in a similar form and manner as other
information required by law is posted.
4. The provisions of this section shall be construed to be consistent and in
conjunction with section 160.2500.
✔